Missouri, session 2026, HB2917.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 192, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 192.2160, to read as follows:
192.2160. 1. As used in this section, the term "older adult" includes all
individuals sixty years of age or older.
2. All landlords who lease property to older adults shall be required to do the
following:
(1) Provide written lease agreements to older adults before they take possession
of the property;
(2) Provide written lease agreement renewals at least thirty days prior to the end
of the previous lease;
(3) Honor all lease terms agreed upon between the landlord and older adult
tenant;
(4) Maintain properties in a safe, habitable condition;
(5) Disclose all fees in the lease and not charge any additional fees; and
(6) Ensure rent increases follow clear guidelines established by state laws or
regulations and municipal or county ordinances.
3. Any individual who suspects a violation of subsection 2 of this section may
contact the adult protective services hotline operated by the department of health and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2917 2
senior services. The department shall assist with filing formal complaints, referrals to
legal aid, and guidance on tenant rights.
✔